Florida, session 2026, HB1031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsections (5) through (8) of section
23.30, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6)
through (9), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to
that section, to read:
23.30 Florida Customer Service Standards Act.—
(5) PILOT PROGRAM.—
(a) As used in this subsection, the term "callback queue"
means a system that allows a caller to leave a telephone number
at which he or she can be reached at a later time rather than
receiving no answer to his or her call or remaining on hold.
(b) A pilot program is implemented to require a callback
queue to be used by the Department of Commerce in returning
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
calls from claimants concerning reemployment assistance.
(c) All calls must be returned, in the order in which they
were received, by the end of the next business day.
(d) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department of
Commerce must submit a report to the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives which includes
information concerning the effectiveness of the pilot program,
any suggested changes to the program, and a recommendation as to
whether the program should be continued or expanded.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1031 -01-er